Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-8508
Rules and regulations.

The department
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska
Telehealth Act, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations to: (1)
Ensure the provision of appropriate care to patients; (2) prevent fraud and
abuse; and (3) establish necessary methods
and procedures.

Laws 1999, LB 559, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB1076, § 3.
July 18, 2014